Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 3 Dutch Elm Disease

2-17-17.
Plan for suppression.

On the basis of the latest scientific knowledge available, the director of the department of environmental management shall prepare a plan in detail of the proper course of action to be taken to suppress, as far as possible, the spread of Dutch elm disease.

History of Section. P.L. 1954, ch. 3365, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-17

.

2-17-18.
Reimbursement of cities and towns for suppression.

Whenever any city or town expends funds for the suppression or elimination of Dutch elm disease in conformity with the plan created pursuant to §

2-17-7

, it may request reimbursement from the state to the extent of one-half (1/2) of the total cost of labor and material used in that work. The work and cost records involved shall be inspected and approved by the director
of environmental management, or his or her deputies, before reimbursement is made by the state.

History of Section. P.L. 1954, ch. 3365, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-18

; P.L. 1987, ch. 78, § 9.

2-17-19.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that are deemed necessary by the director of environmental management to carry out the provisions of §§

2-17-17

—

2-17-20

, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of those sums, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of
proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1954, ch. 3365, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-19

.

2-17-20.
Research in Dutch elm and related diseases.

The director of the department of environmental management shall, upon receipt of a mutually acceptable budget from the director of the agricultural experiment station of the university of Rhode Island, incorporate that item in his or her annual departmental
budget so as to support adequately the necessary research on the Dutch elm and related wilt disease problems of trees. The research shall consist of development and perfection of agents and techniques to be used in the prevention and/or
suppression of those diseases. The director of environmental management shall, and he or she is authorized to, transfer in lump sum moneys appropriated for this research program to the director of the agricultural experiment station,
and those funds shall be maintained in a special fund to be used explicitly for those studies. Findings accruing from these investigations shall be made public information.

History of Section. P.L. 1954, ch. 3365, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-17-20

.